Maryland, session 2025, HB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
21–116.
(d) (4) On or before [September 1] NOVEMBER 1 each year, the Investment
Committee shall submit a report to the Board of Trustees, the Governor’s Office of Small,
Minority, and Women Business Affairs and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly on:
(i) the identity of the minority business enterprise brokerage and
investment management services firms used by the Investment Committee in the
immediately preceding fiscal year;
(ii) the percentage and dollar value of the assets that are under the
control of the Investment Committee that are under the investment control of minority
business enterprise brokerage and investment management services firms for each
allocated asset class; and
– 1 –

Ch. 767 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) the measures the Investment Committee undertook in the
immediately preceding fiscal year in accordance with paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection.
21–123.2.
(f) (1) On or before [December 1] DECEMBER 31 each year, the Board of
Trustees shall submit a report to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House
Appropriations Committee, and the Joint Committee on Pensions, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, and subject to § 4–335 of the General Provisions
Article, that includes a detailed description of:
(i) the investments, if any, made under this section;
(ii) the recommendations, if any, made under this section;
(iii) the actions, if any, taken by the Board of Trustees on the
recommendations made under this section;
(iv) the investment performance of any investments made under this
section;
(v) to the extent possible, an accounting of the fees and expenses
incurred under this section; and
(vi) to the extent possible, the ratio of funds invested in projects
under this section to the total percentage of venture capital funds raised in the State by all
sources.
24–401.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “DROP” means the Deferred Retirement Option Program established
under this section.
(3) “DROP member” means a member of the State Police Retirement
System who:
(i) is eligible to participate in the DROP as provided in subsection
(c) of this section; and
(ii) elects to participate in the DROP as provided in subsection (e) of
this section.
(b) There is a DROP for eligible members of the State Police Retirement System.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 767
(c) (1) (i) This paragraph applies to an individual who is a member of the
State Police Retirement System on or before June 30, 2011.
(ii) Except for the Secretary of State Police, a member of the State
Police Retirement System is eligible to participate in the DROP if the member:
1. has at least 22 and less than 32 years of [eligibility
service] EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP IN THE STATE
POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM; and
2. is less than 60 years old.
(iii) The Secretary of State Police is eligible to participate in the
DROP if the Secretary has at least 22 years of [eligibility service] EMPLOYMENT IN A
POSITION ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP IN THE STATE POLICE RETIREMENT
SYSTEM.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies to an individual who becomes a member
of the State Police Retirement System on or after July 1, 2011.
(ii) Except for the Secretary of State Police, a member of the State
Police Retirement System is eligible to participate in the DROP if the member:
1. has at least 25 years and less than 32 years of [eligibility
service] EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP IN THE STATE
POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM; and
2. is less than 60 years old.
(iii) The Secretary of State Police is eligible to participate in the
DROP if the Secretary has at least 25 years of [eligibility service] EMPLOYMENT IN A
POSITION ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP IN THE STATE POLICE RETIREMENT
SYSTEM.
(d) An eligible member may elect to participate in the DROP for a period not to
exceed the lesser of:
(1) 7 years;
(2) the difference between 32 years and the member’s [eligibility service]
YEARS OF EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP IN THE STATE
POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM as of the date of the member’s election to participate in
the DROP and retire from the State Police Retirement System;
– 3 –

Ch. 767 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) the difference between age 60 and the member’s age as of the date of
the member’s election to participate in the DROP and retire from the State Police
Retirement System; or
(4) a term selected by the member.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –